Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-5110
Contractual agreements; compliance; effect.

Each district shall take reasonable steps to ensure that contractual agreements pursuant to section 2-5109 are complied with by the applicant. The department shall adequately reimburse the districts for the costs of such purposes. If the applicant does not comply with the terms of the agreement, the district shall discontinue any payments to the applicant.

Laws 1998, LB 1126, § 10.